Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 20 Long-Term Care System Planning

40-20-1.
Long-term-care plan and budget.

The directors of the department of human services, the office of healthy aging, the department of health, and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall develop a five-year (5) Rhode Island long-term-care plan and recommended budget prior to January 1, 1998. In developing the plan, the directors shall seek input and comment from members of the public, consumers, and providers. The plan shall be based on the goals and objectives set forth in the long-term care coordinating council’s “Long-Term Care Plan for Rhode Island: 1995-2000” and shall incorporate at least the following:

Guiding principles:

Address and promote physical, mental, and psycho-social well-being.

Allow consumers to choose less restrictive and more cost-effective and appropriate settings for care.

Place emphasis on consumer choice and satisfaction.

Strive to ensure that all services are available as appropriate to needs and resources.

Base the plan on consumer needs, not provider needs.

Recognize that cost-effectiveness, efficiency, and quality of life are important to public and private-pay consumers.

Essential elements:

A long-term-care coordinator responsible for assisting persons to access long-term-care services shall be available to all communities.

A uniform screening and assessment shall be conducted for anyone seeking state-funded long-term-care assistance. The assessment shall be available to private pay consumers as well.

A consumer long-term-care information system shall be developed in collaboration with the long-term care coordinating council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 359, § 1.

40-20-2.
Long-term-care entry system.

The directors of the department of human services, the office of healthy aging, the department of health, and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, shall work collaboratively to design and implement subject to appropriation by October 1, 2006, a standardized, community-based, comprehensive system for entry into state long-term-care programs and services. The system shall include community-based staff to administer pre-screening long-term-care assessments and care-management services, as defined and required under chapter 66.6 of title 42, and to make recommendations for services, including home- and community-based alternatives to residential care, and to assist with access to services. The long-term-care entry system shall include the essential elements contained in §

40-20-1(b)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 359, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 35.